Washington statutes.
RCW 2.28.020

Contempt—Punishment.

For the effectual exercise of the powers specified in RCW 2.28.010, the court may punish for contempt in the cases and the manner provided by law.

[ 1891 c 54 s 2; RRS s 53.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: CR 45(f).

Contempts: Chapter 7.21 RCW.

Criminal contempts: Chapter 7.21 RCW, RCW 9.92.040.

Power of judicial officer to punish for contempt: RCW 2.28.060, 2.28.070.

Witnesses, failure to attend as contempt: RCW 5.56.061 through 5.56.080.